Washington statutes.
RCW 36.05.060

Practice in civil actions to prevail.

The practice, procedure, rules of evidence, and appeals to the supreme court or the court of appeals applicable to civil actions, are preserved under this chapter.

[ 1971 c 81 s 96; 1963 c 4 s 36.05.060. Prior: 1897 c 76 s 7; RRS s 3970.]